Utah statutes.
63M-1-703.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Business team consultant" means an experienced technology executive, entrepreneur, or business person who:

(a)  is recruited by the office through a request for proposal process to work directly with a college or university in the Technology Commercialization and Innovation Program; and

(b)  works with the institution to facilitate the transition of its technology into industry by assisting the institution in developing strategies, including spin out strategies when appropriate, and go-to-market plans, and identifying and working with potential customers and partners.

(2)  "Direct license" means the licensing between a company and a Utah college or university of technology developed at the college or university for the intent of commercializing the technology or facilitating its transition into industry.

(3)  "Licensee" means:

(a)  a company that executes or is in the process of executing a direct license; or

(b)  a sublicensee of the technology from a direct license.

(4)  "Technology Commercialization and Innovation Program" means university-based, federal- and industry-supported cooperative research and development programs.

